Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1523
Township road contracts; payment from township fund; bond issues for bridge construction or repair.

Where any contract is let by the township board, the expense of which is to be borne exclusively by the township, it shall be paid from the township fund; Provided, if, under any law of this state, bonds are voted to aid in the building or repairing of any bridge, the expense shall be paid by such bonds or the proceeds thereof.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 23, p. 522.